tables/no-no-g1.ctb
# liblouis: Norwegian literary braille, 6-dot, contracted level 1
#
#-name: Norsk litterær punktskrift, 6-punkt, kortskrift nivå 1
#-index-name: Norwegian, contracted, grade 1
#-display-name: Norwegian grade 1 contracted braille
#
#+language:no
#+language:nb
#+language:nn
#+type:literary
#+direction:both
#+contraction:partial
#+dots:6
#+grade:1
#
#  Copyright (C) 2005 ViewPlus Technologies, Inc. www.viewplus.com
#  Copyright (C) 2009-2014, 2025-2026 Lars Bjørndal <lars@lamasti.net>
#
#-copyright: 2005, ViewPlus Technologies, Inc. www.viewplus.com
#-copyright: 2009-2014, 2025-2026, Lars Bjørndal
#-license: LGPLv2.1
#
# Created June 9, 2005 by Leon Ungier <Leon.Ungier@ViewPlus.com> with
# help and guidance from Lars Bjørndal <lars@lamasti.net>.
# Modified Sep 30, 2005 by LU
# Heavily overworked by lars@lamasti.net, 2009.
#
#-author: Leon Ungier <Leon.Ungier@ViewPlus.com>
#-author: Lars Bjørndal <lars@lamasti.net>
#
# Official norwegian braille specifications are collected here:
# http://liblouis.io/braille-specs/norwegian
# This specific table is based on the document "Kortskrift i norsk punktskrift - KS04".
#
# Input is expected to be normalized to NFC (fully composed)
#-unicode-form:nfc
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#

#------------------------------------------------------
nofor word æ 56-345

# To get contractions correct before/after asterisk and slash, those
# chars have to be redifined as punctuation, not math.
punctuation * 35
punctuation / 34

# Universal accent sign should be used most of the times with contracted braille
noback lowercase á 4-1	   	       	        # a with acute
base uppercase Á á
noback lowercase à 4-1				# a with grave
base uppercase À à
noback lowercase č 4-14   	       	        # c with caron
base uppercase Č č
noback lowercase ç 4-14   	       	        # c with cedilla
base uppercase Ç ç
noback lowercase đ 4-145			# d with stroke
base uppercase Đ đ
noback lowercase ð 4-145			# eth
base uppercase Ð ð
noback lowercase ê 4-15                        # e with circumflex
base uppercase Ê ê
noback lowercase è 4-15			# e with grave
base uppercase È è
noback lowercase ï 4-24			# i with diaeresis
base uppercase Ï ï
noback lowercase í 4-24			# i with acute
base uppercase Í í
noback lowercase ŋ 4-1345			# eng
base uppercase Ŋ ŋ
noback lowercase ô 4-135			# o with circumflex
base uppercase Ô ô 4-6-135
noback lowercase ó 4-135			# o with acute
base uppercase Ó ó
noback lowercase ò 4-135			# o with grave
base uppercase Ò ò
noback lowercase ǫ 4-135			# o with ogonek
base uppercase Ǫ ǫ
noback lowercase þ 4-2345			# thorn
base uppercase Þ þ
noback lowercase ŧ 4-2345			# t with stroke
base uppercase Ŧ ŧ
noback lowercase ṥ 4-234			# s with acute and dot above
base uppercase Ṥ ṥ
noback lowercase š 4-234			# s with caron
base uppercase Š š
noback lowercase ú 4-136			# u with acute
base uppercase Ú ú
noback lowercase ž 4-1356			# z with caro
base uppercase Ž ž
noback lowercase ý 4-13456			# y with acute
base uppercase Ý ý

include no-no-g0.utb
capsnocont
#------------------------------------------------------
# -------------- level 1 contractions -----------------
#------------------------------------------------------
endword ar 3456
word at 1
word ble 12
word de 1456
endword de 1456
word du 145
word eg 1245
word eller 15
word ellers 15-234
contraction es
word en 126
endword en 126
word ende 126-1456
endword ende 126-1456
word er 156
endword er 156
word & 56-346
word et 346
endword et 346
begword z 56-1356
begword Z 56-1356
word etter 1356
begword etter 1356
word ettersom 1356-234
contraction zs
word etterpå 1356-1234
contraction zp
word for 1246											# level 1 contractions
begword for 1246
endword for 1246
word forhold 12346
begword forhold 12346
endword forhold 12346

word forholdsvis 12346-1236

word fra 124											# level 1 contractions
word før 246
word gjennom 12456
begword gjennom 12456
endword gjennom 12456

word han 125
word hans 125-234
contraction hs

word har 1235
word hun 136
begword w 56-2456
begword W 56-2456
word hvor 2456
begword hvor 2456
word hvordan 2456-145
contraction wd

word ikke 24-13
contraction ik
word ikkje 24-13-245
contraction ikj
word jeg 245
word kan 13
word like 123
word mange 134
word med 146
word mye 13456
word når 1345

word og 14												# level 1 contractions
word også 14-234
contraction cs
word oss 135										
begword x 56-1346
begword X 56-1346

word over 1346
begword over 1346

word på 1234
word som 234
word til 2345
begword q 56-12345
begword Q 56-12345
word under 12345
begword under 12345

#match %[^_~] \x0023 %[^_~] 56-3456
word var 3456
word \x0023 56-3456
word ved 1236
word være 345											# level 1 contractions
noback nocontractsign 56
contraction a 56-1
contraction b 56-12
contraction c 56-14
contraction d 56-145
contraction e 56-15
contraction f 56-124
contraction g 56-1245
contraction h 56-125
contraction j 56-245
contraction k 56-13
contraction l 56-123
contraction m 56-134
contraction n 56-1345
contraction o 56-135
contraction p 56-1234
contraction q 56-12345
contraction r 56-1235
contraction s 56-234
contraction t 56-2345
contraction u 56-136
contraction v 56-1236
contraction w 56-2456
contraction x 56-1346
contraction y 56-13456
contraction z 56-1356
contraction æ 56-345
contraction ø 56-246
contraction A 56-6-1
contraction B 56-6-12
contraction C 56-6-14
contraction D 56-6-145
contraction E 56-6-15
contraction F 56-6-124
contraction G 56-6-1245
contraction H 56-6-125
contraction J 56-6-245
contraction K 56-6-13
contraction L 56-6-123
contraction M 56-6-134
contraction N 56-6-1345
contraction O 56-6-135
contraction P 56-6-1234
contraction Q 56-6-12345
contraction R 56-6-1235
contraction S 56-6-234
contraction T 56-6-2345
contraction U 56-6-136
contraction V 56-6-1236
contraction W 56-6-2456
contraction X 56-6-1346
contraction Y 56-6-13456
contraction Z 56-6-1356
contraction Æ 56-6-345
contraction Ø 56-6-246
seqdelimiter /-–—*'
seqbeforechars ([{"“‘«
seqafterchars  )]}"”’.,;:!?…»

noback pass2 @6-56-12345 @56-6-12345
nofor  pass2 @56-6-12345 @6-56-12345
noback pass2 @6-56-2456 @56-6-2456
nofor  pass2 @56-6-2456 @6-56-2456
noback pass2 @6-56-1346 @56-6-1346
nofor  pass2 @56-6-1346 @6-56-1346
noback pass2 @6-56-1356 @56-6-1356
nofor  pass2 @56-6-1356 @6-56-1356
nofor context @56-3456 "#"
# -------------------------------------------------------------------
